Utah statutes.
10-8-72.   Libraries and reading rooms -- Establishment and maintenance.
They may establish, maintain and regulate free public libraries and reading
rooms, as provided by law, and may perpetuate such free libraries and reading
rooms as may have been heretofore established in the city.
